en: Veal paupiette cooked in oven
fr: Paupiette de veau cuite au four

en: Veal minced steak with 20% fat
fr: Steak haché de veau à 20% de matières grasses

en: Veal minced steak with 15% fat
fr: Steak haché de veau à 15% de matières grasses

en: Veal rump steak
fr: Rumsteck de veau, Rumsteak de veau

en: Frozen veal rump steak
fr: Rumsteck de veau surgelé, Rumsteak de veau surgelé

en: Veal shin
fr: Cuisseau de veau

en: Frozen veal shin
fr: Cuisseau de veau surgelé

en: Veal offals
fr: Abats de veau

en: Frozen veal offals
fr: Abats de veau surgelés

en: Game
de: Wildfleisch, Wild
fr: Gibiers, Gibier
hr: Igra

en: Frozen game meat
fr: Viande de gibier surgelée

en: Ground game meat
fr: Viande de gibier hachée

en: Frozen ground game meat
fr: Viande de gibier hachée surgelée

en: Hare meats
fr: Viande de lièvre

en: Hare shoulder
fr: Epaule de lièvre

en: Frozen hare shoulder
fr: Epaule de lièvre surgelée

en: Hare leg
fr: Cuisse de lièvre

en: Frozen hare leg
fr: Cuisse de lièvre surgelée

en: Hare offals
fr: Abats de lièvre

en: Frozen hare offals
fr: Abats de lièvre surgelés